Washington statutes.
RCW 36.88.400

Safeguarding open canals or ditches—Installation and construction—Costs.

Any county, establishing a road improvement district for canal protection, notwithstanding any laws to the contrary, may require the district, agency, person, corporation, or association, public or private, which operates and maintains the canal or ditch to supervise the installation and construction of safeguards, and must make reimbursement to said operator for all actual costs incurred and expended.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.88.400. Prior: 1959 c 75 s 7.]